Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 State Officers and Employees

Law reviews.

For note, “Shoot at Me Once: Shame on You! Shoot at Me Twice: Qualified Immunity. Qualified Immunity Applies Where Police Target Innocent Bystanders,” see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 1171 (2020).

45-9-1.
General provisions.

In addition to any other compensation which may be paid to an officer, official, or employee of any agency, board, bureau, commission, department, or authority of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of government of this state, each such agency, board, bureau, commission, department, or authority is authorized, in its discretion, to purchase policies of liability insurance or contracts of indemnity or to formulate sound programs of self-insurance utilizing funds available to such agency, board, bureau, commission, department, or authority, insuring or indemnifying such officers, officials, or employees to the extent that they are not immune from liability against personal liability for damages arising out of the performance of their duties or in any way connected therewith. Such policies of liability insurance, contracts of indemnity, or programs of self-insurance may also provide for reimbursement to an officer, official, or employee of any agency, board, bureau, commission, department, or authority of this state for reasonable legal fees and other expenses incurred in the successful defense of any criminal proceeding, including, but not limited to, any criminal cause of action, suit, investigation, subpoena, warrant, request for documentation or property, or threat of such action whether formal or informal where such action arises out of the performance of his or her official duties. In addition, in the case of an officer, official, or employee who is required to maintain a professional license, such reimbursement may also be provided for legal fees and other expenses so incurred in the successful defense of a charge arising out of the performance of his or her official duties in proceedings before a professional licensing board, disciplinary board or commission, or other similar body. Legal fees and other expenses shall be subject to adjustment by and the approval of the Attorney General.

Such agencies, boards, bureaus, commissions, departments, or authorities may expend federal and state or other available funds for such purposes. The amount of such insurance or indemnity shall also be in the discretion of such agency, board, bureau, commission, department, or authority.

For the purpose of this article, the term “agency” shall specifically include, but shall not be limited to, public retirement systems of state-wide application established by the laws of this state, but shall not include counties or municipalities; provided, however, that the employees of community service boards, county departments of health, and county departments of family and children services as well as the members of the boards of said departments shall be considered to be state employees or officials for the purpose of this article. In order to facilitate the administration of liability coverage or other insurance coverages provided the community service boards, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall designate a central office which shall be responsible for obtaining, submitting, and collecting all underwriting information and insurance premiums requested and assessed by the Department of Administrative Services. In order to facilitate the administration of liability coverage or other insurance coverages provided county departments of family and children services, the Department of Human Services shall designate a central office which shall be responsible for obtaining, submitting, and collecting all underwriting information and insurance premiums requested and assessed by the Department of Administrative Services. In order to facilitate the administration of liability coverage or other insurance coverages provided county departments of health, the Department of Public Health shall designate a central office which shall be responsible for obtaining, submitting, and collecting all underwriting information and insurance premiums requested and assessed by the Department of Administrative Services.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1051, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 674, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1383, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 993, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1717, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 230, § 1/SB 175; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-49/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 85/HB 24; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments regarding Georgia’s insurance laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 117 (1979).

For article surveying developments in Georgia insurance law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 143 (1981).

For article, “The Fall and Rise of Official Immunity,” see 25 Ga. St. B.J. 93 (1988).

For annual survey of local government law, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 317 (1991).

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

45-9-2.
Members of organized militia serving on state active duty.

Members of the organized militia who are serving on state active duty upon orders of the Governor may be provided protection against personal liability for damages sustained by third parties and arising out of the performance of such members’ duties while serving on state active duty. At the option of the adjutant general, members of the organized militia who are performing their duties in connection with domestic action projects may also be provided protection against personal liability for damages sustained by third parties arising out of the performance of such members’ duties. The commissioner of administrative services shall prescribe the terms and conditions under which such personnel may be covered by any liability insurance policy or contract of indemnity or other like or similar programs administered by the commissioner pursuant to this article to provide such protection.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1358, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-9-3.
Insurance and other protections afforded personnel employed by district attorney.

Personnel employed by the district attorneys of the state, irrespective of the source of the funds used to pay such personnel, may be covered by any liability insurance policy or contract of indemnity, reimbursement, or other like or similar programs administered by the commissioner pursuant to this article and, for the purpose of this article, such personnel employed by a district attorney shall be considered to be state employees. The commissioner of administrative services shall prescribe the terms and conditions under which any liability insurance policy or contract of indemnity, reimbursement, or other like or similar programs administered by the commissioner pursuant to this article shall be made available to personnel employed by a district attorney. The cost of such liability insurance policy or contract of indemnity, reimbursement, or other like or similar programs shall be paid by the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia out of such funds as may be appropriated to or otherwise available for the operations of district attorneys.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 399, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 988, § 3.

45-9-3.1.
[Repealed] Immunity from liability for law enforcement officers directing or escorting funeral processions.

History.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 993, § 2. The provisions of former Code Section 45-9-3.1 have been added to Code Section 40-6-76 as subsection (h) by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1319, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1319, § 1, effective July 1, 1990.

45-9-4.
Purchase of insurance or indemnity contracts; self-insurance program; Hazardous Materials Liability Reserve Fund; insurer insolvency; Liability coverage to nonprofit agencies and employees contracting with state agencies.

When the commissioner of administrative services determines that an adequate number of agencies, boards, bureaus, commissions, departments, or authorities of this state have requested the commissioner to do so, the commissioner shall have the authority to purchase policies of liability insurance, reinsurance, or contracts of indemnity insuring or indemnifying the officers, officials, or employees of such agencies, boards, bureaus, commissions, departments, or authorities against personal liability for damages arising out of the performance of their duties or in any way connected therewith, under a master policy or on a blanket coverage basis with or without deductibles or excess coverage. The commissioner may provide for endorsements for contractual liability and, where necessary or convenient to the public functions of the state, the commissioner may also provide for additional insureds. In such event, the commissioner may alternatively retain all moneys paid to the Department of Administrative Services as premiums on such policies of liability insurance or contracts of indemnity, all moneys received as interest, and all moneys received from other sources to set up and maintain a reserve fund for the payment of such liability under, and the expenses necessary to administer properly, a self-insurance program. If the commissioner decides to institute a self-insurance program, the commissioner shall establish and maintain a reserve fund for the payment of liabilities arising out of claims against officers, officials, and employees of the state and for any additional insureds. The commissioner shall also charge to state entities such premiums, deductibles, and other payments taking into account any direct appropriations as shall be necessary to maintain the soundness of the insurance or self-insurance programs established under this Code section. The commissioner is further authorized to establish incentive programs, including differential premium rates based on participation in loss control programs established by the department, increased or decreased deductibles based on participation in loss control programs established by the department, and the imposition of fines and penalties. If any premiums, deductibles, fines, or penalties are unpaid, the department is authorized to deduct any unpaid amounts from the nonpaying agency’s or authority’s continuation budget subject to the approval of the Office of Planning and Budget and deposit those funds into the liability trust fund provided for in this Code section. Any amounts held by the commissioner which are available for investment shall be paid over to the Office of the State Treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit such funds in a trust account for credit only to the self-insurance program. The state treasurer shall invest these funds subject to the limitations of Code Section 50-5A-7 and Chapter 17 of Title 50. All income derived from such investments shall accrue to the self-insurance program. When moneys are paid over to the Office of the State Treasurer, as provided in this subsection, the commissioner shall submit an estimate of the date such funds shall no longer be available for investment. When the commissioner wishes to withdraw funds from the trust account provided for in this Code section, he or she shall submit a request for such withdrawal, in writing, to the state treasurer.

On April 19, 1994, the commissioner of administrative services shall transfer all funds from the Hazardous Materials Liability Reserve Fund into the State Tort Claims Trust Fund established pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 21 of Title 50.

If the insurer of any liability policy purchased for the benefit of the officers and employees of the state or state authorities shall become or has become insolvent, be placed into receivership, be subject to any other delinquency or bankruptcy proceeding, cancel its policies, or take or have taken against it like actions, the commissioner of administrative services may protect such employees against loss by such means as he may determine, including without limitation undertaking to cover, insure, or self-insure the corresponding liabilities and expenses, including without limitation claims, contingent claims, and incurred but unreported claims. However, the commissioner shall incur no obligation beyond the funds then available for commitment to the obligation. For these purposes the commissioner may proceed against such insurer, its receiver, or other representative and any other appropriate person by means of the state’s own claim or by assignment, subrogation, or otherwise.

The commissioner of administrative services is authorized in his discretion either to purchase commercial insurance coverage or to self-insure under an existing self-insurance trust fund all foster parents and foster children participating in programs sponsored by the Department of Human Services or in the care and custody of the Department of Human Services upon a request from the commissioner of human services. The commissioner of administrative services will establish appropriate premiums and limits applicable to such requested insurance coverage. The Department of Human Services is authorized to pay the premiums for such insurance from available appropriated funds or other available sources of funds.

If requested by the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission, the commissioner of administrative services is authorized, at the commissioner’s discretion, to establish a consolidated insurance program to furnish general liability insurance, workers’ compensation insurance, builders’ risk insurance, or general liability and workers’ compensation and builders’ risk insurance for all contractors on a construction project (wrap up). The premium for such insurance shall be paid from funds appropriated by the General Assembly to construct the project, and, at the completion of a project, any savings attributable to the consolidated insurance program less administrative costs shall be returned by the Department of Administrative Services to the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission.

The commissioner of administrative services is authorized in his or her discretion either to purchase commercial insurance coverage or to self-insure under an existing self-insurance trust fund all attention and contract homeparents and those youth participating in programs sponsored by the Department of Juvenile Justice or in the care and custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice upon a request from the commissioner of juvenile justice. The commissioner of administrative services shall establish appropriate premiums and limits applicable to such requested insurance coverage. The Department of Juvenile Justice is authorized to pay the premiums for such insurance from available appropriated funds or other available sources of funds.

The policy of insurance provided for in this Code section may also provide liability coverage to nonprofit agencies and their employees, which agencies have contracted with the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Transportation, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, or the Department of Human Services to furnish certain services; provided, however, that such liability coverage shall be limited to damages arising out of the authorized use of a state-owned vehicle or a vehicle funded pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 49-2-13.1 by an employee of such nonprofit agency during the course of such person’s employment with such nonprofit agency and the cost of such insurance furnished to any such nonprofit agency and its employees shall be allocated to and paid by such agency before any coverage shall be effective. For the purpose of this Code section, “nonprofit agency” means any nonprofit or charitable organization, association, corporation, partnership, or other entity registered pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1051, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 150, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 45; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1714, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1154, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2966, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 416, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1717, § 4; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1474, § 5; Ga. L. 2008, p. 245, §§ 1, 2/SB 425; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 2-2, 2-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 20/SB 244; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, §§ 2, 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45/SB 340.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “State Financing” for “State Finance” near the beginning and near the end of subsection (e).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, “On April 19, 1994, the commissioner of administrative services” was substituted for “On the effective date of this Act, the commissioner of the Department of Administrative Services” in subsection (b).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “commissioner of administrative services” was substituted for “commissioner of the Department of Administrative Services” throughout subsections (d) and (e).

45-9-4.1.
Participation in self-insurance by Georgia Correctional Industries Administration; extension of coverage to officers, officials, and employees.

The Georgia Correctional Industries Administration, as a body corporate and politic, and as an instrumentality and public corporation of this state, may, at its discretion, participate in any program of self-insurance administered by the commissioner of administrative services pursuant to Code Section 45-9-4; and the commissioner of administrative services is authorized to extend liability coverage under such program of self-insurance to the officers, officials, or employees of the Georgia Correctional Industries Administration in the same manner as is presently or may hereafter be provided for officers, officials, or employees of any agency, board, bureau, commission, department, or authority pursuant to Code Section 45-9-4.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1117, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “Code Section 45-9-4” was substituted for “said Code section” at the end of this Code section.

45-9-4.2.
Liability coverage for nonprofit agencies providing services to the developmentally disabled.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term “nonprofit agency” means a nonprofit or charitable organization, association, corporation, partnership, or other entity registered pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Nonprofit agencies and their employees, which agencies have contracted with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities to furnish certain services to the developmentally disabled or have subcontracted with similar nonprofit agencies for the same, shall be provided protection against personal liability for damages sustained by third parties arising out of the provision of authorized services to the developmentally disabled by an employee of such agency during the course of such person’s employment with such nonprofit agency. The commissioner of administrative services shall prescribe the terms and conditions under which such nonprofit agencies and their employees shall be covered by any liability insurance policy or contract of indemnity or similar program administered by the commissioner pursuant to this article to provide such protection, provided the cost of such insurance, indemnity, or similar program furnished to any such nonprofit agency and its employees shall be allocated to and paid by such agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-4.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1836, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 245, § 3/SB 425; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 3-2, 3-5/HB 228.

U.S. Code.

Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (a), is codified as

26 U.S.C. § 501(c)

(3).

45-9-5.
Article not waiver of immunity from action or provision of liability insurance protection.

Nothing in this article shall constitute a waiver of the immunity of the state from any action. The exercise of authority provided in this article shall not constitute the provision of liability insurance protection under Article I, Section II, Paragraph IX of the Constitution.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1051, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 150, § 2.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Fall and Rise of Official Immunity,” see 25 Ga. St. B.J. 93 (1988).

For article, “Local Government Tort Liability: the Summer of ’92,” see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 405 (1993).